Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-6,211.05
Ignition interlock device; continuous alcohol monitoring device and abstention from alcohol use; orders authorized; prohibited acts; violation; penalty; costs; Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund; created; use; investment; prohibited acts relating to tampering with device; hearing.

(1) If an order is granted under section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 and sections 60-6,197.02 and 60-6,197.03, the court may order that the defendant install an ignition interlock device of a type approved by the Director of Motor Vehicles on each motor vehicle operated by the defendant during the period of revocation. Upon sufficient evidence of installation, the defendant may apply to the director for an ignition interlock permit pursuant to section 60-4,118.06. The device shall, without tampering or the intervention of another person, prevent the defendant from operating the motor vehicle when the defendant has an alcohol concentration greater than three-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood or three-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his or her breath. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue an ignition interlock permit to the defendant under section 60-4,118.06 only upon sufficient proof that a defendant has installed an ignition interlock device on any motor vehicle that the defendant will operate during his or her release.

(2) If the court orders installation of an ignition interlock device and issuance of an ignition interlock permit pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court may also order the use of a continuous alcohol monitoring device and abstention from alcohol use at all times. The device shall, without tampering or the intervention of another person, test and record the alcohol consumption level of the defendant on a periodic basis and transmit such information to probation authorities.

(3)(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, any order issued by the court pursuant to this section shall not take effect until the defendant is eligible to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (8) of section 60-498.01. A person shall be eligible to be issued an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device if he or she is not subject to any other suspension, cancellation, required no-driving period, or period of revocation and has successfully completed the ignition interlock permit application process. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall review its records and the driving record abstract of any person who applies for an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device to determine (i) the applicant's eligibility for an ignition interlock permit, (ii) the applicant's previous convictions under section 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or any previous administrative license revocation, if any, and (iii) if the applicant is subject to any required no-drive periods before the ignition interlock permit may be issued.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any order issued by the court, or issued pursuant to a court order or administrative license revocation order from another jurisdiction that substantially complies with this section and section 60-6,197.03, shall not take effect until the defendant is eligible to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (8) of section 60-498.01. A person shall be eligible to be issued an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device if he or she is not subject to any other suspension, cancellation, required no-driving period, or period of revocation and has successfully completed the ignition interlock permit application process. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, before the ignition interlock permit may be issued, review its records and the driving record abstract of any person who applies for an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device to determine (i) the applicant's eligibility for an ignition interlock permit, (ii) the applicant's previous convictions under section 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or any previous administrative license revocation, if any, and (iii) if the applicant is subject to any required no-drive periods.

(4)(a) If the court orders an ignition interlock device or the Board of Pardons orders an ignition interlock device under section 83-1,127.02, the court or the Board of Pardons shall order the defendant to apply for an ignition interlock permit as provided in section 60-4,118.06 which indicates that the defendant is only allowed to operate a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device.

(b) Such court order shall remain in effect for a period of time as determined by the court not to exceed the maximum term of revocation which the court could have imposed according to the nature of the violation and shall allow operation by the defendant of only an ignition-interlock-equipped motor vehicle.

(c) Such Board of Pardons order shall remain in effect for a period of time not to exceed any period of revocation the applicant is subject to at the time the application for a reprieve is made.

(5) Any person restricted to operating a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to a Board of Pardons order, who operates upon the highways of this state a motor vehicle without such device or if the device has been disabled, bypassed, or altered in any way, shall be punished as provided in subsection (3) of section 83-1,127.02.

(6) If a person ordered to use a continuous alcohol monitoring device and abstain from alcohol use pursuant to a court order as provided in subsection (2) of this section violates the provisions of such court order by removing, tampering with, or otherwise bypassing the continuous alcohol monitoring device or by consuming alcohol while required to use such device, he or she shall have his or her ignition interlock permit revoked and be unable to apply for reinstatement for the duration of the revocation period imposed by the court.

(7) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the approval of ignition interlock devices, the means of installing ignition interlock devices, and the means of administering the ignition interlock permit program.

(8)(a) The costs incurred in order to comply with the ignition interlock requirements of this section shall be paid directly to the ignition interlock provider by the person complying with an order for an ignition interlock permit and installation of an ignition interlock device.

(b) If the Department of Motor Vehicles has determined the person to be indigent and incapable of paying for the cost of installation, removal, or maintenance of the ignition interlock device in accordance with this section, such costs shall be paid out of the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund if such funds are available, according to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. Such costs shall also be paid out of the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund if such funds are available and if the court or the Board of Pardons, whichever is applicable, has determined the person to be indigent and incapable of paying for the cost of installation, removal, or maintenance of the ignition interlock device in accordance with this section. The Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund is created. Money in the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund may be used for transfers to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(9)(a)(i) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the appropriate district probation office or the appropriate court, as applicable, of any evidence of tampering with or circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, when the facility becomes aware of such evidence. Failure of the facility to provide notification as provided in this subdivision is a Class V misdemeanor.

(ii) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, if the ignition interlock permit is issued pursuant to sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04, of any evidence of tampering with or circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, when the facility becomes aware of such evidence. Failure of the facility to provide notification as provided in this subdivision is a Class V misdemeanor.

(b) If a district probation office receives evidence of tampering with or circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, from an ignition interlock service facility, the district probation office shall notify the appropriate court of such violation. The court shall immediately schedule an evidentiary hearing to be held within fourteen days after receiving such evidence, either from the district probation office or an ignition interlock service facility, and the court shall cause notice of the hearing to be given to the person operating a motor vehicle pursuant to an order under subsection (1) of this section. If the person who is the subject of such evidence does not appear at the hearing and show cause why the order made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section should remain in effect, the court shall rescind the original order. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to an order made by the Board of Pardons pursuant to section 83-1,127.02.

(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the issuance of an ignition interlock permit by the Department of Motor Vehicles under section 60-498.01 or an order for the installation of an ignition interlock device and ignition interlock permit made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section as part of a conviction, as well as the administration of such court order by the Office of Probation Administration for the installation, maintenance, and removal of such device, as applicable, shall not be construed to create an order of probation when an order of probation has not been issued.

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 55;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 16;

Laws 2008, LB736, § 10;

Laws 2009, LB497, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB924, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 40;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 46;

Laws 2013, LB158, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 27;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 28;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 150.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Under the language of subsection (2) of this section, if the sentencing court orders the use of a continuous alcohol monitoring device, the convicted person using the continuous alcohol monitoring device must abstain from alcohol use at all times. State v. Sikes, 286 Neb. 38, 834 N.W.2d 609 (2013).

An ignition-interlock permitholder who drives a vehicle not equipped with an ignition interlock device may not be charged under section 60-6,197.06 and must be charged under subsection (5) of this section. State v. Hernandez, 283 Neb. 423, 809 N.W.2d 279 (2012).

A trial court's refusal to grant the use of an ignition interlock device under this section was proper where the use of the device was not found to be a condition necessary or likely to ensure that the defendant would lead a law-abiding life. State v. Kuhl, 16 Neb. App. 127, 741 N.W.2d 701 (2007).